Georgia, session 2025_26, HB517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Student Success Support Act."
SECTION 2.
Code Section 20-2-154 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the remedial
education program under the "Quality Basic Education Act," is amended by adding a new
subsection to read as follows:
H. B. 517
- 1 -

LC 49 2212
"(c) Subject to appropriations, the State Board of Education shall establish a program to
provide up to a total of $3 million per school year in grants to local school systems and
public schools to be used to provide supplemental remedial education services to address
the respective literacy and math deficiencies of students in kindergarten through grade 12
who attend a public school that performed in the lowest five percent of all public schools
based on the cumulative individual school ratings, as provided for in subsection (d) of Code
Section 20-14-33, for the two most recent school years for which the Office of Student
Achievement issued such ratings."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 517
- 2 -